Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 5.4. Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee.

§ 62.1-69.34.
Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee established; purpose; membership; terms; meetings.

The Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee, hereinafter referred to as the “Committee,” is hereby established in the executive branch of state government as an advisory committee to the Virginia delegation to the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission. The Committee shall assist the delegation in fulfilling its duties and carrying out the objectives of the Commission, pursuant to §

62.1-69.39

. The advisory committee shall be composed of 23 members as follows: two members of the Senate, whose districts include a part of the Virginia portion of the Roanoke River Basin, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; four members of the House of Delegates, whose districts include a part of the Virginia portion of the Roanoke River Basin, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; one nonlegislative citizen member at large appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; one nonlegislative citizen member at large appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; 11 nonlegislative citizen members selected by the legislative members of the advisory committee such that two are chosen from recommendations of each of the following: the Central Virginia Planning District Commission, the West Piedmont Planning District Commission, the Southside Planning District Commission, the Piedmont Planning District Commission, and the Roanoke Valley Alleghany Planning District Commission; and one member selected by the legislative members of the advisory committee from among recommendations submitted by the New River Valley Planning District Commission; and the Virginia member of the United States House of Representatives, whose district includes the largest portion of the Basin, or his designee, and three representatives of the State of North Carolina appointed in a manner as the General Assembly of North Carolina may determine appropriate. Except for the representatives of North Carolina, all nonlegislative citizen members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth of Virginia. The Virginia member of the United States House of Representatives, the members of the Virginia General Assembly, and the representatives of North Carolina shall serve ex officio without voting privileges. Of the recommendations submitted by planning district commissions authorized to recommend two members, one member shall be a nonlegislative citizen who resides within the respective planning district. However, the New River Valley Planning District Commission may recommend either one nonlegislative citizen at large who resides within the planning district or one member, who at the time of the recommendation, is serving as an elected member or an employee of a local governing body, or one member of the board of directors or an employee of the planning district commission. All persons recommended by the planning district commissions to serve as members of the advisory committee shall reside within the Basin’s watershed, represent the diversity of interests in the jurisdictions comprising the respective planning district commissions, and demonstrate interest, experience, or expertise in water-related Basin issues.

State and federal legislative members and local government officials appointed to the advisory committee shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the House of Delegates to serve on the advisory committee, and ex officio members representing the State of North Carolina shall serve a term of two years. Initially, planning district commissions authorized to recommend two nonlegislative citizen members to the advisory committee shall recommend one member for a term of two years and one member for a term of one year. However, the nonlegislative citizen member recommended to serve on the advisory committee by the New River Valley Planning District Commission shall serve a term of one year. After the initial staggering of terms, the term of office of nonlegislative citizen members recommended by the planning district commissions shall be for two years. Nonlegislative citizen members recommended by planning district commissions shall be eligible for reappointment, if such members shall have attended at least one-half of all meetings of the Commission during their current term of service. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.The advisory committee shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its voting members. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the advisory committee shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the voting members so request.

History.

2002, cc. 657, 843; 2003, c. 885; 2004, c. 403; 2010, cc. 394, 729.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, cc. 657 and 843, each enacted sections relating to the Roanoke River Basin. Chapter 657 placed these sections as a new Chapter 5.4 of Title 62.1, while c. 843 placed them in new Chapters 5.4 and 5.5 of Title 62.1. Many but not all of the sections were identical. Subsequently, Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 3 repealed Acts 2002, c. 657.

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 2, provides:
“That the provisions of this act pertaining to the State of North Carolina, including its participation in, funding for, and responsibilities to the Roanoke River Bi-State Commission, shall become effective upon the date of enactment of a comparable act establishing the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission by the General Assembly of North Carolina.” See North Carolina G.S. 77-90 et seq., effective October 1, 2002.

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 3, provides: “That, upon the effective date of this act,
the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee shall organize and commence its work.”

Acts 2002, c. 843, cl. 4, provides: “That, upon the decision of the General Assembly of North Carolina not to enact or repeal comparable legislation establishing the Roanoke River Bi-State Commission, the Virginia Roanoke River Basin Advisory Committee shall assume the powers and duties of the Roanoke River Basin Bi-State Commission, in accordance with §

62.1-69.39

.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885, cl. 1, rewrote this section.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 4, repealed Acts 2002, c. 657. See the Editor’s note.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 403 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 394 and 729 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection B, deleted the former seventh sentence, which read: “Nonlegislative citizen members shall serve for no more than three consecutive two-year terms.” and deleted the former tenth sentence, which read: “The remainder of any term to which a nonlegislative citizen member is appointed to fill shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.”

§ 62.1-69.35.
Compensation and expenses.

Legislative members of the advisory committee shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of members shall be paid from such funds as may be provided to the Department of Environmental Quality in the appropriations act for this purpose.

History.

2002, c. 843; 2003, c. 885.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 inserted “nonlegislative members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members,” inserted “§§

2.2-2813

and,” and added the third sentence.

§ 62.1-69.35:1.
Staffing.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall provide staff support to the advisory committee. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the advisory committee, upon request.

History.

2003, c. 885.

§ 62.1-69.35:2.
Chairman’s executive summary of activity and work of the advisory committee.

The chairman of the advisory committee shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the advisory committee no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2003, c. 885.